District of Columbia statutes.
38-804

Deposit of revenues and receipts.

All revenues and receipts of any nature whatever derived from the operation of food services, or as otherwise provided by this chapter shall, under regulations established by the Mayor, be paid to the D.C. Treasurer and deposited in the General Fund, and accounted for within the General Fund as a separate revenue source allocable to provide authorization for such school authority as the Board of Education may approve. Any unexpended balance at the end of the fiscal year shall revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

Oct. 8, 1951, 65 Stat. 369, ch. 448, title I, § 5
Oct. 25, 1968, 82 Stat. 1363, Pub. L. 90-640, § 2
June 14, 1980, D.C. Law 3-70, § 7(k)(2), 27 DCR 1776
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9056, 58 DCR 6226

History

This section is referenced in § 38-806.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 31-804.
1973 Ed., § 31-1404.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 19-21 substituted “the fiscal year shall revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia” for “the year shall be reserved as a restricted fund balance and used to provide authorization to expend for subsequent years subject to the direction of the Board of Education”.

Effect of Amendments